Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1517
Several writs of execution; preference.

When two or more writs of execution against the same debtor are delivered to the officer on the same day, no preference shall be given to either of such writs; but if a sufficient sum of money is not made to satisfy all executions, the amount made shall be distributed to the several creditors in proportion to the amount of their respective demands. In all other cases the writ of execution first delivered to the officer shall be first satisfied; and it shall be the duty of the officer to endorse on every writ of execution the time when he or she received the writ. This section shall not be construed as to affect any preferable lien which one or more of the judgments on which execution issued may have on the lands of the judgment debtor.

R.S.1867, Code § 484, p. 474;

R.S.1913, § 8058;

C.S.1922, § 8999;

C.S.1929, § 20-1517;

R.S.1943, § 25-1517;

Laws 2000, LB 921, § 12.

Judgments transcripted from justice court do not prorate with judgments rendered during term. Moores v. Peycke, 44 Neb. 405, 62 N.W. 1072 (1895).

Hour of receipt is not required on execution from justice or county court. Johnson v. Walker, 23 Neb. 736, 37 N.W. 639 (1888).

Executions delivered to officer on same day prorate and apply to proceedings before justice of peace. State ex rel. Philpott v. Hunger, 17 Neb. 216, 22 N.W. 457 (1885).